Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 4. Discipline

§ 2121.
Unprofessional conduct.

Unprofessional conduct is the conduct prohibited by this section and by

3 V.S.A. § 129a

, whether or not taken by a license holder.

Unprofessional conduct shall include:

sexual harassment of a patient;

engaging in a sexual act as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 3251

with a patient;

any of the following except when reasonably undertaken in an emergency situation in order to protect life, health, or property:

practicing or offering to practice beyond the scope permitted by law;

accepting and performing physical therapy responsibilities that the licensee knows or has reason to know that he or she is not competent to perform; or

performing physical therapy services that have not been authorized by the consumer or the consumer’s legal representative.

After hearing, an administrative law officer may take disciplinary action against a licensee or applicant found guilty of unprofessional conduct. A finding of unprofessional conduct shall be grounds for:

denying an application for licensure;

revoking, suspending, or conditioning a license; or

otherwise disciplining a licensee.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1997, No. 40

, § 49;

1997, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 44;

1999, No. 52

, § 14;

2005, No. 27

, § 64;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 21.